DI-40

DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

DIDYA-01

DTC [P0 110/24*Intake Air Temperature Sensor Circuit

HINT:
*: Only for Europe
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Fig. 1 The intake air temperature sensor is built into the air flow meter
and senses the intake air temperature. A thermistor built in the
sensor changes the resistance value according to the intake air
30 - temperature. The lower the intake air temperature, the greater
20 - the thermistor resistance value, and the higher the intake air
10 L temperature, the lower the thermistor resistance value (See
- Fig. 1).
S : Acceptable The intake air temperature sensor is connected to the engine
Q 2t ECU. The 5 V power source voltage in the engine ECU is ap-
§ . L plied to the intake air temperature sensor from terminal THAF
2 = via resistor R. That is, resistor R and the intake air temperature
T g:gf sensor are connected in series. When the resistance value of
- the intake air temperature sensor changes, according to
021 changes in the intake air temperature, the voltage at terminal
o1t THAF also varies. Based on this signal, the engine ECU in-
S R creases the fuel injection volume to improve driveability during
fg;fggg?giﬂl%owezm coldl engine operation.
Temp. C (°F)
Fl14741
DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area
L . L * Openorshortinintake airtemp. sensor circuit
Open or short in intake air temp. sensor circuit for 0.5 sec. or . L .
P0110/24 more ¢ Intake airtemp. sensor (builtinto air flow meter)
*EngineECU
HINT:

When DTC P0110/24 is detected, check the intake air temperature by entering the following menus on the
intelligent tester II: Powertrain / Engine and ECT / Data List / Intake Air.

Temperature displayed

Malfunction

—40°C (-40°F)

Open circuit

140° C (284 °F) or more

Short circuit
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:

. If DTCs related to different systems that have terminal E2 as the ground terminal are output simulta-
neously, terminal E2 may have an open circuit.
. Read freeze frame data using the intelligent tester Il. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions
when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the
vehicle was running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, and other data from the time the

malfunction occurred.

When using intelligent tester II:

1 Connect intelligent tester Il, and read value of intake air temperature.

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the intelligent tester Il to the DLCS.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the intelligent tester 1l main switch ON.

CHECK:

Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.

OK:

Same as actual intake air temperature.

HINT:

« If there is open circuit, intelligent tester Il indicates -40° C (-40°F).
. If there is short circuit, intelligent tester |l indicates 140° C (284°F) or more.

@

NG>

-40°C (-40°F)...Gotostep2.
140°C (284 ° F) ormore... Goto step 4.

DI-4).

Check for intermittent problems (See page

1HD-FTV ENGINE SUP (RM1179E)




DI-42

DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

2 | Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

@ON

Intake Air
Temp. Sensor

BE6653
FI7055

Engine ECU

A00214

e ]

PREPARATION:
(@) Disconnect the air flow miter connector.
(b) Connect the sensor wire harness terminals together.
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.
OK:
Temperature value: 140°C (284°F) or more

OK Confirm good connection at sensor. If OK, re-
place air flow meter.

3 | Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

Intake Air Temp. Sensor Engine ECU

c :
I

g
B
£

THAF E2

A23886

@

PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the glove compartment door.

(b) Connect between terminals THAF and E2 of the engine
ECU connector.

HINT:

The air flow meter connector is disconnected. Before checking,

do avisual and contact pressure check for the engine ECU con-

nector (See page IN-19).

(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.

OK:
Temperaturevalue: 140°C (284 °F) or more

OK Open in harness between terminal E2 or THAF,
repair or replace harness.

OK, replace engine ECU.

Confirm good connection at engine ECU. If
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4 | Check for short in harness and engine ECU.

@ON

Intake Air
Temp. Sensor

=

BE6653
FI7054

Engine ECU

A00216

@

PREPARATION:
(@) Disconnect the air flow meter connector.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.
OK:
Temperature value: -40°C (-40°F)

ox )

Replace air flow meter.

a

Check for short in harness or engine ECU.

Intake Air Temp. Sensor Engine ECU
R . THA?
[] T TN LIS
(T T VO
O O Oo)|0Oooon|m DIDI’
mnjjjunjjjusnnji{aunnsfpyunn//{an]jjun]jjus

E16 Connector

A23887

PREPARATION:
(@) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E16 connector from the engine ECU.
HINT:
The air flow meter connector is disconnected.
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester Il
OK:
Temperature value: -40°C (-40°F)

OKé pair or replace harness or connector.

IN-19).

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
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When not using intelligent tester II:

1 | Check voltage between terminals THAF and E2 of engine ECU connector.

PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the glove compartment door.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

2 |||| |||||||I| m

aifleeris Measure the voltage between terminals THAF and E2 of the en-

W gine ECU connector.

E5
B2g
Bt

OK:
THAF E2 -
Atmospheric Temperature Voltage
M A23883 20°C (68°F) (Engine is cool) 0.2t103.8V
80°C (176°F) (Engine is hot) 0.1t01.5V

OK> Check for intermittent problems (See page
DI-4).

NG

2 | Check intake air temperature sensor.

PREPARATION:

@J* E2 Disconnect the air flow meter connector.
Ohmmeter THA m _ ]
Using an ohmmeter, measure the resistance between terminals
-O- THA and E2.
QO oK
Terminals Resistance Temperature
THA - E2 12.5 10 16.9 kQ -20°C (-4°F)
Y B08173 THA - E2 2.19 10 2.67 kQ 20°C (68°F)
THA - E2 0.50 to 0.68 kQ 60°C (140°F)
NG> Replace air flow meter.
OK

3 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
atmospheric temperature sensor (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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OK

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN-19).
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